California, session 20252026, AB1823.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11818 is added to the Government Code, immediately following Section 11817, to read:11818. (a) Every agency or department subject to the Governor’s authority shall, for any strategic plan, do both of the following:(1) Develop or update the strategic plan to reflect the use of data analysis and inclusive practices to more effectively advance racial equity and to respond to identified disparities with changes to the organization’s mission, vision, goals, data tools, policies, programs, operations, community engagement, tribal consultation policies and practices, and any other actions as necessary to serve all Californians.(2) As part of the development or updating of strategic plans, engage and gather input from California communities that have been historically disadvantaged and underserved within the scope of policies or programs administered or implemented by the agency or department and make the plans publicly available.(b) Every agency or department subject to the Governor’s authority shall undertake a racial equity analysis before implementing any budget or before any regulation takes effect, by the agency’s or department’s diversity, equity, and inclusion officer or comparable position. If that position does not exist, the racial equity analysis shall be performed by an individual who has demonstrated expertise, and has demonstrated satisfaction of appropriate criteria, in at least one of the following areas:(1) Analyzing, implementing, or developing public policies that impact racial equity.(2) Providing technical assistance in developing and implementing strategies for racial equity, including, but not limited to, guidance on employee training and support, developing racial equity programming, and assisting organizations and departments on changing policies and practices to improve racial equity outcomes.(3) Being a member of or representing a racial equity-focused organization that works with an impacted community.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to establish a statewide definition of equity to ensure that legislation, policies, resource allocations, and systemic practices empower and meet the unique needs of diverse and underserved populations, and to ensure that communities facing the greatest inequities are not negatively affected or left behind in the allocation of resources in a fair and just way. ___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________